New York, session 2025-2026, A4525.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0125 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0125. Prohibitions against the sale of anti-fogging sprays or wipes 4 containing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. 5 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 6 the following meanings: 7 (a) "Anti-fogging sprays or wipes" means any product, including a 8 spray, cloth, wipe or other material, that is intended to prevent 9 condensation on eyeglasses. 10 (b) "Intentionally added chemical" shall have the same meaning as 11 subdivision four of section 37-0121 of this title. 12 (c) "Manufacturer" means a person, firm, association, partnership or 13 corporation: 14 (i) that produces or whose brand name is affixed to anti-fogging 15 sprays or wipes; or 16 (ii) in the case of anti-fogging sprays or wipes that were imported 17 into the United States, "manufacturer" means the importer or first EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07241-06-6 A. 4525--B 2 1 domestic distributor of such anti-fogging sprays or wipes if no person 2 who is a manufacturer within the meaning of subparagraph (i) of this 3 paragraph has a presence in the United States. 4 (d) "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS 5 substances" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at 6 least one fully fluorinated carbon atom. 7 2. No person shall sell or offer for sale in this state anti-fogging 8 sprays or wipes containing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances 9 as intentionally added chemicals or that contain perfluoroalkyl and 10 polyfluoroalkyl substances at or above a level that the department shall 11 establish in regulation. 12 3. No person that sells or offers for sale any anti-fogging sprays or 13 wipes shall be held in violation of this section if they can show that 14 they relied in good faith on the written assurance of the manufacturer 15 of such product that such product met the requirements of this section. 16 Such written assurance shall take the form of a certificate of compli- 17 ance stating that such product is in compliance with the requirements 18 of this section. The certificate of compliance shall be signed by an 19 authorized official of the manufacturer. 20 4. In addition to any other applicable penalties, it shall be a 21 violation of this section to provide a certificate of compliance as 22 contemplated by subdivision three of this section when the applicable 23 anti-fogging sprays or wipes do not satisfy the prohibitions on the 24 presence of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances set forth in 25 subdivision two of this section. 26 § 2. Section 71-3703 of the environmental conservation law is amended 27 by adding a new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 28 8. Any person who violates any of the provisions of, or who fails to 29 perform any duty imposed by section 37-0125 of this chapter or any rule 30 or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, shall be liable for a civil 31 penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each day during which 32 such violation continues, and in addition thereto, such person may be 33 enjoined from continuing such violation. Such person shall for a second 34 violation be liable to the people of the state for a civil penalty not 35 to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for each day during which 36 such violation continues. 37 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day 38 after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, 39 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 40 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized and 41 directed to be made and completed on or before such effective date.